Illinois, session 104th, HB5385.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Interest Attorney Assistance Act is 5amended by changing Sections 15 and 20 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 916/15)7    Sec. 15. Definitions. For the purposes of this Act:8    "Assistant State's Attorney" means a full-time employee of 9a State's Attorney in Illinois or the State's Attorneys 10Appellate Prosecutor who is continually licensed to practice 11law and prosecutes or defends cases on behalf of the State or a 12county.13    "Assistant Attorney General" means a full-time employee of 14the Illinois Attorney General who is continually licensed to 15practice law and prosecutes or defends cases on behalf of the 16State.17    "Assistant Public Defender" means a full-time employee of 18a Public Defender in Illinois or the State Appellate Defender 19who is continually licensed to practice law and provides legal 20representation to indigent persons, as provided by statute.21    "Assistant public guardian" means a full-time employee of 22a public guardian in Illinois who is continually licensed to 23practice law and provides legal representation pursuant to   HB5385- 2 -LRB104 18212 LNS 31651 b1court appointment.2    "Civil legal aid" means free or reduced-cost legal 3representation or advice to low-income clients in non-criminal 4matters.5    "Civil legal aid attorney" means an attorney who is 6continually licensed to practice law and is employed full time 7as an attorney at a civil legal aid organization in Illinois.8    "Civil legal aid organization" means a not-for-profit 9corporation in Illinois that (i) is exempt from the payment of 10federal income tax pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the 11Internal Revenue Code, (ii) is established for the purpose of 12providing legal services that include civil legal aid, (iii) 13employs 2 or more full-time attorneys who are licensed to 14practice law in this State and who directly provide civil 15legal aid, and (iv) is in compliance with registration and 16filing requirements that are applicable under the Charitable 17Trust Act and the Solicitation for Charity Act.18    "Commission" means the Illinois Student Assistance 19Commission.20    "Committee" means the advisory committee created under 21Section 20 of this Act.22    "Eligible debt" means outstanding principal, interest, and 23related fees from loans obtained for undergraduate, graduate, 24or law school educational expenses made by government or 25commercial lending institutions or educational institutions. 26"Eligible debt" excludes loans made by a private individual or   HB5385- 3 -LRB104 18212 LNS 31651 b1family member.2    "IGAC attorney" means a full-time employee of the Illinois 3Guardianship and Advocacy Commission, including the Office of 4State Guardian, the Legal Advocacy Service, and the Human 5Rights Authority, who is continually licensed to practice law 6and provides legal representation to carry out the 7responsibilities of the Illinois Guardianship and Advocacy 8Commission.9    "Legislative attorney" means a full-time employee of the 10Illinois Senate, the Illinois House of Representatives, or the 11Illinois Legislative Reference Bureau who is continually 12licensed to practice law and provides legal advice to members 13of the General Assembly.14    "Program" means the Public Interest Attorney Loan 15Repayment Assistance Program.16    "Public interest attorney" means an attorney practicing in 17Illinois who is an assistant State's Attorney, assistant 18Public Defender, civil legal aid attorney, assistant Attorney 19General, assistant public guardian, IGAC attorney, or 20legislative attorney, or solo practitioner in or employed by a 21private practice in a county with 20 or fewer attorneys in 22private practice.23    "Qualifying employer" means (i) an Illinois State's 24Attorney or the State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor, (ii) 25an Illinois Public Defender or the State Appellate Defender, 26(iii) an Illinois civil legal aid organization, (iv) the   HB5385- 4 -LRB104 18212 LNS 31651 b1Illinois Attorney General, (v) an Illinois public guardian, 2(vi) the Illinois Guardianship and Advocacy Commission, (vii) 3the Illinois Senate, (viii) the Illinois House of 4Representatives, or (ix) the Illinois Legislative Reference 5Bureau, or (x) a private practice in a county with 20 or fewer 6attorneys in private practice.7(Source: P.A. 96-615, eff. 1-1-10; 96-768, eff. 1-1-10.) 8    (110 ILCS 916/20)9    Sec. 20. Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment 10Assistance Program. 11    (a) The Commission shall establish and administer the 12Program for the primary purpose of providing loan repayment 13assistance to practicing attorneys to encourage them to pursue 14careers as public interest attorneys to protect the rights of 15this State's most vulnerable citizens, provide services to 16persons in underserved or rural areas, or provide quality 17enforcement of State law. The Commission shall create an 18advisory committee composed of representatives from 19organizations with relevant expertise, including one person 20from each of the following entities:21        (1) The Illinois State's Attorneys Association.22        (2) An office of an Illinois Public Defender. 23        (3) An office of an Illinois public guardian.24        (4) The Office of the Illinois Attorney General. 25        (5) An Illinois metropolitan bar association.  HB5385- 5 -LRB104 18212 LNS 31651 b1        (6) An Illinois statewide bar association.2        (7) A public law school in this State. 3    (b) The Public Interest Attorney Loan Repayment Assistance 4Fund is created as a special fund in the State treasury. The 5Fund shall consist of all moneys remitted to the Commission 6under the terms of this Act. All money in the Fund shall be 7used, subject to appropriation, by the Commission for the 8purposes of this Act. 9    (c) Subject to the availability of appropriations and 10subsections (d) and (e) of this Section, the Commission shall 11distribute funds to eligible applicants.12    (d) The Commission is authorized to prescribe all rules, 13policies, and procedures necessary or convenient for the 14administration of the Program and all terms and conditions 15applicable to payments made under this Act. This shall be done 16with the guidance and assistance of the Committee.17    (e) The Commission shall administer the Program, 18including, but not limited to, establishing and implementing 19the following:20        (1) An application process. Subject to the 21    availability of appropriations, the Commission shall, each 22    year, consider applications by eligible public interest 23    attorneys for loan repayment assistance under the Program. 24    All applications must be submitted to the Commission in a 25    form and manner prescribed by the Commission. Applicants 26    must submit any supporting documents deemed necessary by   HB5385- 6 -LRB104 18212 LNS 31651 b1    the Commission at the time of application. 2        (2) Eligibility requirements. The Commission shall, on 3    an annual basis, receive and consider applications for 4    loan repayment assistance under the Program if the 5    Commission finds that the applicant:6            (i) is a citizen or permanent resident of the 7        United States;8            (ii) is a licensed member of the Illinois Bar in 9        good standing or a graduate of a law school located in 10        this State who is a licensed attorney of another state 11        in good standing;12            (iii) has eligible debt in grace or repayment 13        status and has not defaulted on an educational loan; 14        and15            (iv) is employed as a public interest attorney 16        with a qualifying employer in Illinois; and .17            (v) has earned no more than $120,000 from the 18        practice of law in the prior 12 months, not including 19        health insurance premiums or other employment benefits 20        that are paid by the applicant's employer. 21        (3) A maximum amount of loan repayment assistance for 22    each participant, which shall be $10,000 $6,000 per year, 23    up to a maximum of $50,000 $30,000 during the 24    participant's career.25        (4) Prioritization. The Commission shall develop 26    criteria for prioritization among eligible applicants in   HB5385- 7 -LRB104 18212 LNS 31651 b1    the event that there are insufficient funds available to 2    make payments to all eligible applicants under this Act. 3    The prioritization criteria shall include the timeliness 4    of the application, the applicant's salary level, the 5    amount of the applicant's eligible debt, the availability 6    of other loan repayment assistance to the applicant, the 7    applicant's length of service as a public interest 8    attorney, and the applicant's prior participation in the 9    Program.10    (f) The distribution of funds available after 11administrative costs must be made by the Commission to 12eligible public interest attorneys in the following manner:13        (1) Loan repayment assistance must be in the form of a 14    forgivable loan.15        (2) To have the loan forgiven, the participant shall 16    (i) complete a year of employment with a qualifying 17    employer and (ii) make educational debt payments (interest 18    or principal or both) that equal at least the amount of 19    assistance received under the Program during the 20    assistance year.21        (3) Each loan must be documented by means of a 22    promissory note executed by the borrower in a form 23    provided by the Commission and shall be forgiven when an 24    eligible participant meets the requirements set forth by 25    the Commission. 26(Source: P.A. 96-615, eff. 1-1-10; 96-768, eff. 1-1-10.)